Nebraska, session 109, LB381.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB381 LB381
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 68-974, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-974 (1) One or more program integrity contractors may be used to
promote the integrity of the medical assistance program, to assist with
investigations and audits, or to investigate the occurrence of fraud,
waste, or abuse. The contract or contracts may include services for (a)
cost-avoidance through identification of third-party liability, (b) cost
recovery of third-party liability through postpayment reimbursement, (c)
casualty recovery of payments by identifying and recovering costs for
claims that were the result of an accident or neglect and payable by a
casualty insurer, and (d) reviews of claims submitted by providers of
services or other individuals furnishing items and services for which
payment has been made to determine whether providers have been underpaid
or overpaid, and to take actions to recover any overpayments identified
or make payment for any underpayment identified.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all program
integrity contractors when conducting a program integrity audit,
investigation, or review shall:
(a) Provide clear written justification to the provider for
commencing an audit;
(b) Review claims within one year four years from the date of the
payment. After one year from the date of payment, a payment shall not be
subject to adjustment, except in the case of fraud by a provider;
(c) (b) Send a determination letter concluding an audit within one
hundred eighty days after receipt of all requested material from a
provider;
(d) Furnish (c) In any records request to a provider, furnish
information sufficient for the provider to identify the patient,
procedure, or location in any records request to a provider. A records
request shall be limited to relevant documents proportional to the
services being audited as provided in subsection (12) of this section;
-2-

LB381 LB381
2025 2025
(e) (d) Develop and implement with the department a procedure with
the department in which an improper payment identified by an audit may be
resubmitted as a claims adjustment, including (i) the resubmission of
claims denied as a result of an interpretation of scope of services not
previously held by the department, (ii) the resubmission of documentation
when the document provided is incomplete, illegible, or unclear, and
(iii) the resubmission of documentation when clerical errors resulted in
a denial of claims for services actually provided. If a service was
provided and sufficiently documented but denied because it was determined
by the department or the contractor that a different service should have
been provided, the department or the contractor shall disallow the
difference between the payment for the service that was provided and the
payment for the service that should have been provided;
(f) (e) Utilize a licensed health care professional from the
specialty area of practice being audited to establish relevant audit
methodology consistent with (i) state-issued medicaid provider handbooks
and (ii) established clinical practice guidelines and acceptable
standards of care established by professional or specialty organizations
responsible for setting such standards of care;
(g) Schedule onsite audits with advance notice of not less than ten
business days and make a good faith effort to establish a mutually
agreed-upon time and date for the onsite audit;
(h) Not require any requested documentation following an onsite
audit sooner than ninety days from the date of the request to the
provider for such information; and
(i) (f) Provide a detailed written notification and explanation of
an adverse determination that would result in partial or full recoupment
of payment. The written notification and explanation shall include: (i)
The full name of the beneficiary who received the health care services
for which overpayment was made; (ii) the dates of service; (iii) the
amount of the overpayment; (iv) the claim number or other identifying
-3-

LB381 LB381
2025 2025
numbers; (v) a detailed explanation of the basis for the overpayment
determination, including each finding and supporting evidence upon which
the determination is based; (vi) the method in which payment was made,
including, the date of payment and, if applicable, the check number;
(vii) the appropriate procedure to submit a claims adjustment under
subdivision (e) of this subsection; (viii) a statement that the provider
may appeal the determination as provided in subsection (16) of this
section; (ix) the method by which recovery of the overpayment will be
made if recovery is initiated; and (x) a statement that an overpayment
shall not be recouped for at least sixty days after the date of notice of
adverse findings. includes the reason for the adverse determination, the
medical criteria on which the adverse determination was based, an
explanation of the provider's appeal rights, and, if applicable, the
appropriate procedure to submit a claims adjustment in accordance with
subdivision (2)(d) of this section; and
(g) Schedule any onsite audits with advance notice of not less than
ten business days and make a good faith effort to establish a mutually
agreed-upon time and date for the onsite audit.
(3) Any provision of a contract between a third-party payer and a
provider or beneficiary that violates subsection (2) of this section is
unenforceable.
(4) (3) A program integrity contractor retained by the department or
the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services shall work with
the department at the commencement start of a recovery audit to review
this section and section 68-973 and any other relevant state policies,
procedures, regulations, and guidelines regarding program integrity
audits. The program integrity contractor shall comply with this section
regarding audit procedures. A copy of the statutes, policies, and
procedures shall be specifically maintained in the audit records to
support the audit findings.
(5)(a) (4) The department shall exclude from the scope of review of
-4-

LB381 LB381
2025 2025
recovery audit contractors:
(i) A any claim processed or paid through a capitated medicaid
managed care program;
(ii) A claim that is not a primary insurance claim; and
(iii) A claim . The department shall exclude from the scope of
review of program integrity contractors any claims that is are currently
being audited or that has have been audited by a program integrity
contractor, by the department, or by another entity. Claims processed or
paid through a capitated medicaid managed care program shall be
coordinated between the department, the contractor, and the managed care
organization. All such audits shall be coordinated as to scope, method,
and timing. The contractor and the department shall avoid duplication or
simultaneous audits.
(b) No payment shall be recovered (i) in a medical necessity review
in which the provider has obtained prior authorization for the service
and the service was performed as authorized, (ii) for any part of a
payment that the audit recovery contractor determines to be an
overpayment if the recovery process is initiated later than one year
after the payment was made to the provider, or (iii) for reimbursement
based on a clerical error made by the provider.
(6) (5) Extrapolated overpayments are not allowed under the Medical
Assistance Act without evidence of a sustained pattern of error, an
excessively high error rate, or the agreement of the provider.
(7) (6) The department may contract with one or more persons to
support a health insurance premium assistance payment program.
(8) (7) The department may enter into any other contracts deemed to
increase the efforts to promote the integrity of the medical assistance
program.
(9) A contract (8) Contracts entered into under the authority of
this section may be on a contingent fee basis if (a) the contract is in
compliance with federal law and regulations, (b) the contingent fees are
-5-

LB381 LB381
2025 2025
not greater than twelve and one-half percent of the amounts recovered,
and (c) the contract provides that contingency fee payments are based on
amounts recovered, not amounts identified. Contracts entered into on a
contingent fee basis shall provide that contingent fee payments are based
upon amounts recovered, not amounts identified. Whether the contract is a
contingent fee contract or otherwise, the contractor shall not recover
overpayments by the department until all appeals have been completed
unless there is a credible allegation of fraudulent activity by the
provider, the contractor has referred the claims to the department for
investigation, and an investigation has commenced. In that event, the
contractor may recover overpayment prior to the conclusion of the appeals
process. In any contract between the department and a program integrity
contractor, the payment or fee provided for identification of
overpayments shall be the same provided for identification of
underpayments. Contracts shall be in compliance with federal law and
regulations when pertinent, including a limit on contingent fees of no
more than twelve and one-half percent of amounts recovered, and initial
contracts shall be entered into as soon as practicable under such federal
law and regulations.
(10) The payment or fee for identification of overpayments shall be
the same as that for identification of underpayments in any contract
between the department and a program integrity contractor. The contractor
shall not recover an overpayment by the department until all appeals have
been exhausted unless there is a credible allegation of provider fraud
and: (a) The contractor provides the provider with a statement of the
reasons for the decision, including a determination on each finding upon
which such decision was based, (b) the contractor refers the claim to the
department for investigation, and (c) an investigation has commenced.
(11) (9) All amounts recovered and savings generated as a result of
this section shall be returned to the medical assistance program.
(12) (10) Records requests made by a program integrity contractor in
-6-

LB381 LB381
2025 2025
any one-hundred-eighty-day period shall be limited to not more than two
hundred records for the specific service being reviewed. The contractor
shall allow a provider no less than forty-five days to respond to and
comply with a records request. If the contractor can demonstrate a
significant provider error rate relative to an audit of records, the
contractor may make a request to the department to initiate an additional
records request regarding the subject under review for the purpose of
further review and validation. The contractor shall not make the request
until the time period for the appeals process has expired.
(13) (11) On an annual basis, the department shall require the
recovery audit contractor to compile and publish on the department's
Internet website metrics related to the performance of each recovery
audit contractor. Such metrics shall include: (a) The number and type of
issues reviewed; (b) the number of medical records requested; (c) the
number of overpayments and the aggregate dollar amounts associated with
the overpayments identified by the contractor; (d) the number of
underpayments and the aggregate dollar amounts associated with the
identified underpayments; (e) the duration of audits from initiation to
time of completion; (f) the number of adverse determinations and the
overturn rating of those determinations in the appeal process; (g) the
number of appeals filed by providers and the disposition status of such
appeals; (h) the contractor's compensation structure and dollar amount of
compensation; and (i) a copy of the department's contract with the
recovery audit contractor.
(14) (12) The program integrity contractor, in conjunction with the
department, shall perform educational and training programs for providers
that encompass a summary of audit results, a description of common
issues, problems, and mistakes identified through audits and reviews, and
opportunities for improvement.
(15) A provider (13) Providers shall be allowed to submit records
requested as a result of an audit in electronic format, including compact
-7-

LB381 LB381
2025 2025
disc, digital versatile disc, or other electronic format deemed
appropriate by the department or via facsimile transmission, at the
request of the provider.
(16)(a) (14)(a) A provider shall have the right to appeal a
determination made by a the program integrity contractor. The program
integrity contractor shall not recoup an overpayment until all appeals
have been exhausted unless there is a credible allegation of fraud and
the contractor complies with the requirements in subsection (10) of this
section. A program integrity contractor shall provide (i) appeal
procedures and timelines at the commencement of any audit, and (ii) a
contact telephone number and an email address or physical address for
submission of written questions regarding an audit and the appeal
process. A program integrity contractor shall respond to a question
submitted by a provider no later than ten business days after the date of
submission.
(b) The contractor shall establish an informal consultation process
to be utilized prior to the issuance of a final determination. Within
thirty days after receipt of notification of a preliminary finding from
the contractor, the provider may request an informal consultation with
the contractor to discuss and attempt to resolve the findings or portion
of such findings in the preliminary findings letter. The request shall be
made to the contractor. The consultation shall occur within thirty days
after the provider's request for informal consultation, unless otherwise
agreed to by both parties.
(c) Within thirty days after notification of an adverse
determination, a provider may request an administrative appeal of the
adverse determination as set forth in the Administrative Procedure Act.
(17) No later than (15) The department shall by December 1 of each
year, the department shall submit an electronic report to the Legislature
on the status of the contracts, including the parties, the programs and
issues addressed, the estimated cost recovery, and the savings accrued as
-8-

LB381 LB381
2025 2025
a result of the contracts. Such report shall be filed electronically.
(18) (16) For purposes of this section:
(a) Adverse determination means any decision rendered by a program
integrity contractor or recovery audit contractor that results in a
payment to a provider for a claim for service being reduced or rescinded;
(b) Clerical error means a minor mistake made while writing, typing,
or copying, including typographical errors, missing signatures,
miswritten numbers, word misspellings, mathematical errors, computer
malfunctions, printing errors, or data entry errors;
(c) Credible allegation of fraud means an allegation, which has been
verified by the department, from any source, including but not limited to
the following: (i) A fraud hotline tip verified by further evidence; (ii)
claims data mining; or (iii) a pattern identified through provider
audits, civil false claims cases, and law enforcement investigations.
Allegations are credible when they have indicia of reliability and the
department has reviewed all allegations, facts, and evidence carefully
and acts judiciously on a case-by-case basis;
(d) (b) Extrapolated overpayment means an overpayment amount
obtained by calculating claims denials and reductions from a medical
records review based on a statistical sampling of a claims universe;
(e) Fraud means an intentional deception or misrepresentation made
by a person with the knowledge that the deception could result in an
unauthorized benefit to any person. It includes an act that constitutes
fraud under applicable federal or state law;
(f) Fraud hotline tip means a complaint or other communication
submitted through a fraud reporting telephone number or website,
including a fraud hotline administered by a health plan or the federal
Department of Health and Human Services Office of Inspector General;
(g) (c) Person means bodies politic and corporate, societies,
communities, the public generally, individuals, partnerships, limited
liability companies, joint-stock companies, and associations;
-9-

LB381 LB381
2025 2025
(h) (d) Program integrity audit means an audit conducted by the
federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the department, or
the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services with the
coordination and cooperation of the department;
(i) (e) Program integrity contractor means private entities with
which the department or the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services contracts to carry out integrity responsibilities under the
medical assistance program, including, but not limited to, recovery
audits, integrity audits, and unified program integrity audits, in order
to identify underpayments and overpayments and recoup overpayments; and
(j) (f) Recovery audit contractor means private entities with which
the department contracts to audit claims for medical assistance, identify
underpayments and overpayments, and recoup overpayments.
Sec. 2. Original section 68-974, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-10-